Utah statutes.
71-9-2.   Contracts subject to appropriation of funds.

Any contract entered into under Section 71-9-1 shall expressly state that it is subject to the appropriation of sufficient funds by the Legislature to carry out its terms and that the decision of the executive director of the Department of Veterans' Affairs as to whether an appropriation is sufficient to carry out the terms of the contract is conclusive.



Amended by Chapter 173, 2007 General Session

